Utah statutes.
48-2a-803 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Winding up.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, the general partners who have not wrongfully dissolved a limited partnership or, if none, the limited partners, may wind up the limited partnership's affairs; but a district court having competent jurisdiction may wind up the limited partnership's affairs upon application of any partner, his legal representative, or assignee.

